Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1009
Reports; requirements.

(1) Any rural or suburban fire protection district, airport authority, city, village, or nonprofit corporation that has had a firefighter file a claim for or receive cancer benefits under the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act shall report such claims filed, claims paid, and types of claims to the State Fire Marshal. On or before December 1, 2023, and on or before December 1 of each year thereafter, the State Fire Marshal shall submit electronically an annual report to the Legislature and Governor stating the number of firefighters who have filed claims pursuant to the act and the number of firefighters who have received benefits under the act.

(2) If the firefighters in a fire department are being provided cancer benefits under the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act, the fire chief of such fire department, or his or her designee, shall submit an annual report to the governing body of the rural or suburban fire protection district, airport authority, city, or village served by such fire department listing the total number of fire suppression incidents occurring during the most recently completed calendar year. Such report shall be submitted on or before February 15, 2023, and on or before February 15 of each year thereafter.

Laws 2021, LB432, § 8.